Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5555XD (3) 91 sc/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 12D.1, subsection 2, paragraph k, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 k. âQualified education expensesâ means the same as 3 âqualified higher education expensesâ as defined in section 4 529(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by Pub. L. 5 No. 115-97 , and shall include elementary and secondary school 6 expenses for tuition described in section 529(c)(7) of the 7 Internal Revenue Code, subject to the limitations imposed by 8 section 529(e)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code. âQualified 9 education expensesâ includes expenses for the participation 10 in an apprenticeship program registered and certified with 11 the United States secretary of labor under section 1 of the 12 National Apprenticeship Act, 29 U.S.C. Â§50, and amounts paid as 13 principal or interest on any qualified education loan on behalf 14 of a beneficiary or a sibling of the beneficiary, subject to 15 the limitations imposed by section 529(c)(9)(B) and (C) of the 16 Internal Revenue Code. 17